Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2024, chapter 125, article 8, section 2, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Direct Care and Treatment - Operations -0- 6,094,000 (a) Free Communication Services for Patients and Clients. $1,368,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for free communication services under article 6, section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. (b) Direct Care and Treatment Capacity; Miller Building. $1,796,000 in fiscal year 2025 is to design a replacement facility for the Miller Building on the Anoka Metro Regional Treatment Center campus. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (c) Direct Care and Treatment County Correctional Facility Support Pilot Program. $2,387,000 in fiscal year 2025 is to establish a two-year county correctional facility support pilot program. The pilot program must: (1) provide education and support to counties and county correctional facilities on protocols and best practices for the provision of involuntary medications for mental health treatment; (2) provide technical assistance to expand access to injectable psychotropic medications in county correctional facilities; and (3) survey county correctional facilities and their contracted medical providers on their capacity to provide injectable psychotropic medications, including involuntary administration of medications, and barriers to providing these services. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end . (d) Advisory Committee for Direct Care and Treatment. $482,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for the administration of the advisory committee for the operation of Direct Care and Treatment. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (e) Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is increased by $31,000 in fiscal year 2026 and increased by $0 in fiscal year 2027.